District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.05

Personnel.

(a)

(1)

In addition to a Director, the Department shall have a Deputy Director, and other professional and support personnel as necessary and appropriate to carry out the agency’s mission.

(2)

The Deputy Director shall have a masters or doctoral degree in an applicable area of science or forensic analysis and a minimum of 2 years experience in forensic sciences.

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 6, 58 DCR 5403

History